Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.365

Women's history consortium—Board of advisors.

The board of advisors shall consist of fifteen members. The director of the state historical society shall appoint eleven members to the board of advisors. Two members of the senate, one each representing the two largest caucuses of the senate, shall be appointed by the president of the senate, and two members of the house of representatives, one each representing the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives, shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

The women's history consortium board of advisors may meet no more than two times per calendar year. If state funds are not available for travel, the board may meet on a voluntary basis at members' expense.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 124; 2005 c 391 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Finding—Intent—2005 c 391: See note following RCW 27.34.360.